Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2026
2-1091

Implementation or enforcement of act; department;
powers.

For the purpose of implementation or enforcement of the Plant Protection and
Plant Pest Act or any rule or regulation, the department may:

(1) Enter at reasonable times and in a reasonable manner without being subject
to any action for trespass or damages, if reasonable care is exercised, all
property where plants are grown, packed, held prior to distribution, or
distributed for the purpose of inspecting all plants, structures, vehicles,
equipment, packing materials, containers, records, and labels on such property
or otherwise implementing or enforcing the act. The department may inspect and
examine all records and property relating to compliance with the act. Such
records and property shall be made available to the department for review at all
reasonable times;

(2) In a reasonable manner, hold for inspection and take samples of any plants
and associated materials which may not be in compliance with the act;

(3) Inspect or reinspect at any time or place any plants that are in the state
or being shipped into or through the state and treat, seize, destroy, require
treatment or destruction of, or return to the state of origin any plants in
order to inhibit or prevent the movement of plant pests throughout the
state;

(4) Obtain an inspection warrant in the manner prescribed in sections 29-830
to 29-835 from a court of record if any person refuses to allow the department
to inspect pursuant to this section;

(5) Issue a written or printed withdrawal-from-distribution order and post
signs to delineate sections not marked pursuant to subsection (3) of section
2-1095 or sections of distribution locations and to notify persons of any
withdrawal-from-distribution order when the department has reasonable cause to
believe any lot of nursery stock is being distributed in violation of the act or
any rule or regulation;

(6) Apply for a restraining order, a temporary or permanent injunction, or a
mandatory injunction against any person violating or threatening to violate the
act or the rules and regulations. The district court of the county where the
violation is occurring or is about to occur shall have jurisdiction to grant
such relief upon good cause shown. Relief may be granted notwithstanding the
existence of any other remedy at law and shall be granted without bond;

(7) Issue a quarantine or establish a quarantine area;

(8) Cooperate and enter into agreements, including harmonization plans, with
any person in order to carry out the purpose of the act;

(9) Establish a restricted plant pest list to prohibit the movement into the
state of plant pests not known to occur in Nebraska and to prohibit the movement
of those plant pests present in the state but known to be destructive to the
plant industry;

(10) Issue European corn borer quarantine certificates, phytosanitary
certificates, and export certificates on plants for individual shipment to other
states or foreign countries if those plants comply with the requirements or
regulations of such state or foreign country or issue quarantine compliance
agreements or European corn borer quarantine certification licenses;

(11) Inspect plants that any person desires to ship into another state or
country when such person has made an application to the department for such
inspection. The inspection shall determine the presence of plant pests to
determine the acceptance of the plants into other states or countries. The
department may accept the inspections of laboratories authorized by the
department or field inspectors of the department;

(12) Certify plants or property to meet the requirements of specific
quarantines imposed on Nebraska or Nebraska plants. The quarantine certification
requirements shall be set forth in the rules and regulations;

(13) Assess and collect fees set forth in section 2-1091.02 for inspections,
services, or work performed in carrying out subdivisions (8) and (10) through
(12) of this section. Inspection time shall be determined based on any portion
of a whole hour and shall include the driving to and from the location of the
inspection in addition to the time spent conducting the inspection, and the
mileage charge shall be for the purpose of inspection. Any fee charged to the
department relating to such subdivisions shall be paid by the person requesting
the inspection, services, or work. The department may, for purposes of
administering such subdivisions, establish in rules and regulations inspection
requirements, standards, and issuance, renewal, or revocation of licenses,
certificates, or agreements necessitated by such subdivisions;

(14) Conduct continuing survey and detection programs on plant pests to
monitor the population or spread of plant pests;

(15) Implement programs or plans to eradicate, manage, treat, or control plant
pests;

(16) Issue, place on probation, suspend, or revoke licenses issued or
agreements entered into pursuant to the act or deny applications for such
licenses or agreements pursuant to the act; and

(17) Issue orders imposing administrative fines or cease and desist orders
pursuant to the act.

Laws 1988, LB 874, § 20;

Laws 1993, LB 406, § 11;

Laws 2013, LB68, § 8;

Laws 2017, LB274, § 2;

Laws 2026, LB948, § 2.

March 17, 2026